Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201772-108
Conveyances of real estate; custody after recording; exception.

All deeds or other instruments conveying any interest in lands to the State of Nebraska, or to any board, department, or commission thereof, shall be carefully deposited in the office of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds for safekeeping after they have been duly recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the real estate is located. This section shall not apply to deeds or other instruments conveying any interest in lands to the Department of Transportation or the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 1957, c. 301, § 1, p. 1105;

Laws 1965, c. 433, § 1, p. 1381;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 246.
July 1, 2017
Records of state lands, see section 84-401.